Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1398DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1398DP (3) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 68A.405, Code 2025, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 5. a. Published material generated through
the use of artificial intelligence and designed to expressly
advocate the nomination, election, or defeat of a candidate
for public office or the passage or defeat of a ballot issue
must contain a disclosure on the published material that the
published material was generated using artificial intelligence.
The disclosure must include the words “this material was
generated using artificial intelligence”.
b. For purposes of this subsection, “artificial
intelligence” means a machine-based system that can, for a
given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual
environments.
c. The board shall adopt rules for the implementation of
this subsection.
d. A disclosure made in compliance with this subsection
does not preclude a private right of action arising out of the
publication of published material generated through the use of
artificial intelligence.